Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1052
Public safety answering point, defined.

Public safety answering point means a local governmental entity responsible for receiving 911 calls and processing those calls according to a specific operational policy.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1022;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 34.